Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2209
Area program plan, defined.

Area program plan shall mean the document submitted to the department by an area agency on aging in order to receive funds under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and under the Older Americans Act, as now or hereafter amended, which details the area agency on aging's plan for a comprehensive, coordinated program of community aging services for such area. The area program plan shall be designed to address the needs of older individuals with the greatest economic need and the greatest social need.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 9.